Connecticut, session 2026, HB05337.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 16-258d of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "District heating system" means a thermal loop natural gas
demand reduction system that is located in a designated area and is
designed to capture an annual minimum of thirty million British
thermal units of waste heat and transmits and distributes at least
seventy-five per cent of such waste heat directly to the premises of end
use customers that are located in such system's service area.
(2) "Gas company" has the same meaning as provided in section 16-
1.
(b) After July 1, 2015, each gas company shall develop an incentive
program for district heating systems for the purpose of reducing natural
HB5337 / File No. 383 1

HB5337 File No. 383
gas demand in the state. As part of the conservation and load
management plan, pursuant to section 16-245m, each gas company shall
submit such program plan for approval to the Energy Conservation
Management Board and the Department of Energy and Environmental
Protection. Said board and department have discretion to jointly
approve or disapprove such plan. Such program shall, on or after March
1, 2016, but not after June 30, 2027, or after the implementation of the
incentive program established pursuant to subsection (c) of this section,
whichever is sooner, provide an incentive payment to end use
customers who connect on or after March 1, 2016, to a district heating
system for heating purposes. Such incentive payment shall be based on
such customer's projected natural gas demand reduction for the period
of time that such customer commits to utilize the services of such
heating system. The projected natural gas demand reduction shall be
based on such customer's weather-adjusted historical usage data from
the previous three years. The amount of the incentive payment made to
such end use customer shall not exceed the incentive payment made for
equivalent natural gas demand reductions through the state's
conservation and load management plan.
(c) Not later than July 1, 2027, the Commissioner of Energy and
Environmental Protection shall, in consultation with the Energy
Conservation Management Board, develop and implement an incentive
program for end use customers who connect to a district heating system.
Any incentive made available through the program shall be calculated
based on the projected lifetime reduction in natural gas consumption
attributable to the district heating system using cost-effectiveness
methodologies that are consistent with the provisions of sections 16-
245m to 16-245o, inclusive, and any regulations adopted pursuant to
said sections.
[(c)] (d) An owner or operator of a district heating system may charge
each end use customer a connection charge up to an amount equal to
the incentive payment received by such end use customer.
[(d)] (e) The Public Utilities Regulatory Authority shall ensure that
HB5337 / File No. 383 2

HB5337 File No. 383
the revenues required to fund such incentive payments made pursuant
to this section are provided through a fully reconciling conservation
adjustment mechanism, which shall not exceed more than nine million
dollars in total for the program established under this section, provided
(1) such revenues shall be in addition to the revenues authorized to fund
the Conservation and Load Management Plan pursuant to section 16-
245m, and (2) such revenues exceeding two million dollars required to
fund such incentive payments shall be paid over a period of not less
than two years. Such revenues shall only be collected from the gas
customers of the company in whose service area such district heating
system is located.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 16-258d
ET Joint Favorable
HB5337 / File No. 383 3

HB5337 File No. 383
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Department of Energy and CC&PUCF - Cost 177,290 127,290
Environmental Protection
Note: CC&PUCF=Consumer Counsel and Public Utility Control Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill results in a cost to the Consumer Counsel and Public Utility
Control Fund of $177,290 in FY 27 and $127,290 in FY 28, by requiring
the Department of Energy and Environmental Protection (DEEP), to
develop and implement an incentive program by July 1, 2027, for end
use gas customers connected to a district heating system. The new
incentive program would replace the existing program and update the
methodology for calculating incentive payments.
The bill will result in a cost to DEEP associated with one additional
Research Analyst position, with an annual salary of $89,755 and
associated fringe benefit costs of $37,535. The new position will be
responsible for cost-effectiveness testing and various approvals
associated with the new program. Additionally, DEEP will require
$50,000 in FY 27, in consulting costs associated with the rollout of the
new program.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to inflation.
HB5337 / File No. 383 4

HB5337 File No. 383
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5337
AN ACT CONCERNING DISTRICT HEATING SYSTEM INCENTIVES.